Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3. Litter Control and Recycling.

§ 10.1-1414.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Advisory Board”
means the Litter Control and Recycling Fund Advisory Board.

“Beneficial use”
means a use that is of benefit as a substitute for natural or commercial products and does not contribute to adverse effects on health or the environment. Beneficial use products are produced by facilities that include beneficiation facilities and recycling centers.

“Beneficiation facility”
means a facility that uses methods including sorting by color, removal of contaminants, crushing, grinding, screening, grading, and monitoring of size and quality to produce clean, crushed glass cullet that satisfies the specifications of the end user of the cullet, including a manufacturer of glass containers or fiberglass.

“Disposable package”
or

“container”

means all packages or containers intended or used to contain solids, liquids or materials and so designated.

“Expanded polystyrene food service container”
means a rigid single-use container made primarily of expanded polystyrene and used in the restaurant and food service industry for serving or transporting prepared, ready-to-consume food or beverages. “Expanded polystyrene food service container” includes plates, cups, bowls, trays, and hinged containers but does not include packaging for unprepared foods or packaging, including a cooler, used in the shipment of food.

“Food vendor”
means an establishment that provides prepared food for public consumption on or off its premises and includes a store, shop, sales outlet, restaurant, grocery store, supermarket, delicatessen, or catering truck or vehicle; any other person who provides prepared food; and any individual, organization, group, or state or local government entity that regularly provides food as a part of its services.

“Fund”
means the Litter Control and Recycling Fund.

“Litter”
means all waste material disposable packages or containers but not including the wastes of the primary processes of mining, logging, sawmilling, farming, or manufacturing.

“Litter bag”
means a bag, sack, or durable material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for litter inside a vehicle or watercraft which is similar in size and capacity to a state approved litter bag.

“Litter receptacle”
means containers acceptable to the Department for the depositing of litter.

“Person”
means any natural person, corporation, association, firm, receiver, guardian, trustee, executor, administrator, fiduciary, or representative or group of individuals or entities of any kind.

“Prepared food”
means a food or beverage prepared for consumption on or off a food vendor’s premises, using any cooking or food preparation technique. “Prepared food” does not include raw or uncooked meat, fish, or eggs provided without further food preparation.

“Public place”
means any area that is used or held out for use by the public, whether owned or operated by public or private interests.

“Recycling”
means the process of separating a given waste material from the waste stream and processing it so that it may be used again as a raw material for a product which may or may not be similar to the original product.

“Recycling center”
means a facility that (i) accepts recyclable materials that have already been separated at the source from municipal solid waste generated by either residential or commercial producers; (ii) processes source segregated recyclable materials, including mixed-paper fiber materials, metal and plastic postconsumer containers, and glass containers; and (iii) processes and sells recyclable materials according to end-user specifications. “Recycling center” does not include a facility for construction and demolition debris processing, sorting of municipal solid waste, incineration, sorting or processing of industrial waste, composting, or used tire processing.

“Sold within the Commonwealth”
or

“sales of the business within the Commonwealth”

means all sales of retailers engaged in business within the Commonwealth and in the case of manufacturers and wholesalers, sales of products for use and consumption within the Commonwealth.

“Vehicle”
includes every device capable of being moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any person or property may be transported upon a public highway, except devices moved by human power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

“Watercraft”
means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating craft.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.1; 1988, c. 891; 1995, c. 417; 2018, c. 615; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 262.

Cross references.

As to local ordinances requiring separation of solid waste, see §

15.2-937

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 615, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) shall provide to the General Assembly, not later than November 1, 2019, an evaluation of Virginia’s solid waste recycling rates and a set of recommendations for improving the reliability of the supply of recycled materials during the next 10 years in order to provide for beneficial use, as defined in §

10.1-1414

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, by industry. The evaluation shall consider incentive-based strategies, including the granting of economic development incentives for the construction of recycling centers and beneficiation facilities that have the potential to increase beneficial use of glass, plastic, metal, and fiber. The evaluation shall also investigate the effect of the operation of mixed-waste material recycling facilities on the quality and quantity of recyclable materials available for beneficial use.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 615 added the definitions for “Beneficial use,” “Beneficiation facility” and “Recycling center” and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 262, effective July 1, 2021, added the definitions of “Expanded polystyrene food service container,” “Food vendor” and “Prepared food.”

§ 10.1-1415.
Litter Control Program.

The Department shall support local, regional, and statewide programs to control, prevent, and eliminate litter from the Commonwealth and to encourage the recycling and beneficial use of discarded materials to the maximum practical extent. Every department of state government and all governmental units and agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Department in the administration and enforcement of this article.

This article is intended to add to and coordinate existing litter control removal and recycling efforts, and not to terminate existing efforts nor, except as specifically stated, to repeal or affect any state law governing or prohibiting litter or the control and disposition of waste.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 284; 1995, c. 417; 2018, c. 615.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 615 inserted “and beneficial use” in the first paragraph.

§ 10.1-1415.1.
Labeling of plastic container products required; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, expose for sale, or distribute any plastic bottle or rigid plastic container unless the container is labeled indicating the plastic resin used to produce the container. Such label shall appear on or near the bottom of the container, be clearly visible, and consist of a number placed within three triangulated arrows and letters placed below the triangle of arrows. The triangulated arrows shall be equilateral, formed by three arrows with the apex of each point of the triangle at the midpoint of each arrow, rounded with a short radius. The pointer (arrowhead) of each arrow shall be at the midpoint of each side of the triangle with a short gap separating the pointer from the base of the adjacent arrow. The triangle, formed by three arrows curved at their midpoints, shall depict a clockwise path around the code number. The numbers and letters shall be as follows:

For polyethylene terepthalate, the letters “PETE” and the number 1.

For high density polyethylene, the letters “HDPE” and the number 2.

For vinyl, the letter “V” and the number 3.

For low density polyethylene, the letters “LDPE” and the number 4.

For polypropylene, the letters “PP” and the number 5.

For polystyrene, the letters “PS” and the number 6.

For any other plastic resin, the letters “OTHER” and the number 7.

As used in subsection A of this section:“Container,” unless otherwise specified, refers to “rigid plastic container” or “plastic bottle” as those terms are defined below.“Plastic bottle” means a plastic container intended for single use that has a neck that is smaller than the container, accepts a screw-type, snap cap or other closure and has a capacity of sixteen fluid ounces or more but less than five gallons.“Rigid plastic container” means any formed or molded container, other than a bottle, intended for single use, composed predominantly of plastic resin, and having a relatively inflexible finite shape or form with a capacity of eight ounces or more but less than five gallons.

Any person convicted of a violation of the provisions of subsection A of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

1990, c. 519.

§ 10.1-1415.2.
Plastic holding device prohibited.

On and after January 1, 1993, it shall be unlawful to sell or offer for sale beverage containers connected to each other, using rings or other devices constructed of plastic which is not degradable or recyclable.

For the purpose of this section:“Beverage container” means the individual bottle, can, jar, or other sealed receptacle, in which a beverage is sold, and which is constructed of metal, glass, or plastic, or other material, or any combination of these materials. “Beverage container” does not include cups or other similar open or loosely sealed containers.“Degradable” means decomposition by photodegradation or biodegradation within a reasonable period of time upon exposure to natural elements.

History.

1991, c. 209.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 5.

§ 10.1-1416.
Collection and survey of litter.

Collections and surveys of the kinds of litter that are discarded in violation of the laws of the Commonwealth shall be conducted as the need is determined by the Department, after receipt of the recommendations of the Advisory Board, or as directed by the General Assembly. The survey shall include litter found throughout the Commonwealth, including standard metropolitan statistical areas and rural and recreational areas. To the fullest extent possible, in standard metropolitan statistical areas the Department of Transportation shall make use of local litter and trash collection services through arrangements with local governing bodies and appropriate agencies, in the discharge of the duties imposed by this section. The Department of Transportation shall report to the Governor, the General Assembly and the Department as to the amount of litter collected pursuant to this section and shall include in its report an analysis of litter types, their weights and volumes, and, where practicable, the recyclability of the types of products, packages, wrappings and containers which compose the principal amounts of the litter collected. The products whose packages, wrappings and containers constitute the litter shall include, but not be limited to the following categories:

Food for human or pet consumption;

Groceries;

Cigarettes and tobacco products;

Soft drinks and carbonated waters;

Beer and other malt beverages;

Wine;

Newspapers and magazines;

Paper products and household paper;

Glass containers;

Metal containers;

Plastic or fiber containers made of synthetic material;

Cleaning agents and toiletries;

Nondrug drugstore sundry products;

Distilled spirits; and

Motor vehicle parts.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.3; 1988, c. 891; 1995, c. 417.

§ 10.1-1417.
Enforcement of article.

The Department shall have the authority to contract with other state and local governmental agencies having law-enforcement powers for services and personnel reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. In addition, all law-enforcement officers in the Commonwealth and those employees of the Department of Wildlife Resources vested with police powers shall enforce the provisions of this article and regulations adopted hereunder, and are hereby empowered to arrest without warrant, persons violating any provision of this article or any regulations adopted hereunder. The foregoing enforcement officers may serve and execute all warrants and other process issued by the courts in enforcing the provisions of this article and regulations adopted hereunder.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.4; 1988, c. 891; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in the second sentence.

§ 10.1-1418.
Penalty for violation of article.

Every person convicted of a violation of this article for which no penalty is specifically provided shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars for each such violation.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.5; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1418.1.
Improper disposal of solid waste; civil penalties.

It shall be the duty of all persons to dispose of their solid waste in a legal manner.

Any owner of real estate in this Commonwealth, including the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, upon whose property a person improperly disposes of solid waste without the landowner’s permission, shall be entitled to bring a civil action for such improper disposal of solid waste. When litter is improperly disposed upon land owned by the Commonwealth, any resident of the Commonwealth shall have standing to bring a civil action for such improper disposal of solid waste. When litter is improperly disposed of upon land owned by any political subdivision of this Commonwealth, any resident of that political subdivision shall have standing to bring a civil action for such improper disposal of solid waste. When any person improperly disposes of solid waste upon land within the jurisdiction of any political subdivision, that political subdivision shall have standing to bring a civil action for such improper disposal of solid waste.

In any civil action brought pursuant to the provisions of this section, when the plaintiff establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that (i) the solid waste or any portion thereof had been in possession of the defendant prior to being improperly disposed of on any of the properties referred to in subsection A of this section and (ii) no permission had been given to the defendant to place the solid waste on such property, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the defendant improperly disposed of the solid waste. When the solid waste has been ejected from a motor vehicle, the owner or operator of such motor vehicle shall in any civil action be presumed to be the person ejecting such matter. However, such presumption shall be rebuttable by competent evidence. This presumption shall not be applicable to a motor vehicle rental or leasing company that owns the vehicle.

Whenever a court finds that a person has improperly disposed of solid waste pursuant to the provisions of this section, the court shall assess a civil penalty of up to $5,000 against such defendant. All civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 (§

10.1-2500

et seq.) of this title, except as provided in subsection E.

Any civil penalty assessed pursuant to this section in a civil action brought by a political subdivision shall be paid into the treasury of the political subdivision, except where the violator of this section is the political subdivision or its agent.

A court may award any person or political subdivision bringing suit pursuant to this section the cost of suit and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

1990, c. 430; 1991, c. 718; 1992, c. 27; 1997, c. 353.

The 1997 amendment

redesignated the former second and third sentences of subsection A as present subsection B; in present subsection B, added the last sentence; redesignated former subsections B through D as present subsections C through E; in present subsection C, added the last two sentences; in present subsection D, substituted “$5,000” for “$200” and at the end of the last sentence, substituted “subsection E” for “subsection D”; in present subsection E, deleted “for improper disposal of solid waste upon land owned by the political subdivision” preceding “shall be paid into the treasury”; and added subsection F.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Applicability. —

While a permit may be required to move or alter a septic system, this section does not provide a private remedy. Since Virginia had no betterment statute providing a remedy for misplaced improvements, the owner had no right to maintain any portion of his septic system on his neighbor’s lot, and it was not unlawful, nor did it give rise to any right of action by the owner so long as the truncation acts occurred wholly on the neighbor’s lot; however, the portion of the owner’s allegations intimating that the neighbor trespassed onto his property to effect the capping of the line was a viable claim. Clark v. Scheulen, 65 Va. Cir. 415, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 269 (Warren County Aug. 26, 2004).

§ 10.1-1418.2.
Improper disposal of tires; exemption; penalty.

For the purposes of this section:“Convenience center” means a collection point for the temporary storage of waste tires provided for individuals who choose to transport waste tires generated on their own premises to an established centralized point, rather than directly to a disposal facility. To be classified as a convenience center, the collection point shall not receive waste tires from collection vehicles that have collected waste from more than one real property owner. A convenience center shall have a system of regularly scheduled collections and may be covered or uncovered.“Speculatively accumulated waste tires” means any waste tires that are accumulated before being used, reused, or reclaimed or in anticipation of potential use, reuse, or reclamation. Waste tires are not being accumulated speculatively when at least 75 percent of the waste tires accumulated are being removed from the site annually.

It shall be unlawful for any person to store, dispose of, speculatively accumulate or otherwise place more than 100 waste tires on public or private property, without first having obtained a permit as required by §

10.1-1408.1

or in a manner inconsistent with any local ordinance. No person shall allow others to store, dispose of, speculatively accumulate or otherwise place on his property more than 100 waste tires, without first having obtained a permit as required by §

10.1-1408.1

.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. However, any person who knowingly violates any provision of this section and such violation involves 500 or more waste tires shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

Salvage yards licensed by the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be exempt from this section, provided that they are holding fewer than 300 waste tires and that the waste tires do not pose a hazard or a nuisance or present a threat to human health and the environment.

As used in this section, the terms “store” and “otherwise place” shall not be construed as meaning the holding of fewer than 500 tires for bona fide uses related to the growing, harvesting or processing of agricultural or forest products.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the (i) storage of less than 1,500 waste tires in a container at a convenience center or at a salvage yard licensed by the Department of Motor Vehicles, as long as the tires are not being speculatively accumulated, or (ii) storage of tires for recycling or for processing to use in manufacturing a new product, as long as the tires are not being speculatively accumulated.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the storage of tires for recycling or for processing to use in manufacturing a new product, as long as the tires are not being speculatively accumulated.

Nothing in this section shall limit enforcement of the prohibitions against littering and the improper disposal of solid waste contained elsewhere in this chapter.

History.

1994, c. 556; 1997, c. 353; 2003, c. 101.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 1997 amendment,

in subsections A and B, substituted “100” for “500” following “more than”; in subsection C, substituted “Class 1 misdemeanor” for “Class 6 felony” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; and added subsection E.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 101, in subsection A, deleted “It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly to store, dump, litter, dispose of, speculatively accumulate or otherwise place more than 100 waste tires on public or private property in the Commonwealth, without first having obtained a permit as required by §

10.1-1408.1

” at the beginning of the introductory language, inserted the definition of “Convenience center,” and in the definition of “Speculatively accumulated waste tires,” substituted “at least 75 percent” for “they can be used, reused, or reclaimed; they have a feasible means of use, reuse, or reclamation available; and at least seventy-five percent”; in subsection B, added the first sentence, and in the second sentence, deleted “knowingly, or knowingly” preceding “allow,” and substituted “to store” for “to, store, dump, litter”; in subsection C, inserted “knowingly” in the first sentence, and substituted “knowingly violates any provision of this section and such violation involves” for “improperly disposes of, or knowingly allows to be improperly disposed of on his property” in the second sentence; in subsection D, inserted “they are holding fewer than 300 waste tires and that” and inserted “or present a threat to human health and the environment”; and added subsections F through H.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

§ 10.1-1418.3.
Liability for large waste tire pile fires; exclusions.

For the purposes of this section:“Tire pile” means an unpermitted accumulation of more than 100 waste tires.

For any tire pile that (i) is included in the survey of waste tire piles completed by the Department in 1993 or (ii) contains tires that were placed on property with the consent of the property owner, any person who owns or is legally responsible for such a tire pile that burns or is burned and any person who owns or is legally responsible for the property where the tire pile is located shall be responsible for the damage caused by the fire and by any waste or chemical constituents released into the environment to any person who sustains damage from the fire or from any released wastes or chemical constituents. It shall not be necessary for the claimant to show that the damage was caused by negligence on the part of such owners, legally responsible persons or other person who set or caused to be set the fire that burns the tires. Damages include, but are not limited to, the cost for any repair, replacement, remediation, or other appropriate action required as a result of the fire. This liability shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other liability authorized by statute or regulation. Without limiting what constitutes consent, acceptance of compensation for the placement of tires on one’s property shall be deemed to be consent.

Any person who sets or causes to be set the fire that burns the tire pile shall be responsible for the damage caused by the fire and by any waste or chemical constituents released into the environment to any person who sustains damage from the fire or from any released wastes or chemical constituents. It shall not be necessary for the claimant to show that the damage was caused by negligence on the part of such owners, legally responsible persons or other persons who set or caused to be set the fire that burns the tires. Damages shall include, but are not limited to, the cost for any repair, replacement, remediation, or other appropriate action required as a result of the fire. This liability shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any liability authorized by statute or regulation.

Any person who transfers waste tires for disposition and has taken all reasonable steps to ensure proper disposition of the waste tires shall not be held liable under the standard set forth in this section. Documentation that a person has taken all reasonable steps to ensure proper disposition of the waste tires may include, but is not limited to, utilization of the Waste Tire Certification developed by the Department and any equivalent manifest or tracking system.

History.

1996, c. 734; 2003, c. 101.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 101 rewrote the definition of “Tire pile”;
in the first sentence of subsection B, added “For any tire pile that (i) is included in the survey of waste tire piles completed by the Department in 1993 or (ii) contains tires that were placed on property with the consent of the property owner” at the beginning, inserted “such” preceding “a tire pile,” inserted “and” following “burned” and deleted “and any person who sets or causes to be set the fire which burns the tire pile” following “located”; substituted “that” for “which” in the second sentence of subsection B and added the last sentence of subsection B; inserted present subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as present subsection D; and substituted “this section” for “subsection B” in the first sentence of subsection D.

§ 10.1-1418.4.
Removal of waste tire piles; cost recovery; right of entry.

Notwithstanding any other provision, upon the failure of any owner or operator to remove or remediate a waste tire pile in accordance with an order issued pursuant to this chapter or §

10.1-1186

, the Director may enter the property and remove the waste tires. The Director is authorized to recover from the owner of the site or the operator of the tire pile the actual and reasonable costs incurred to complete such removal or remediation. If a request for reimbursement is not paid within 30 days of the receipt of a written demand for reimbursement, the Director may refer the demand for reimbursement to the Attorney General for collection or may secure a lien in accordance with §

10.1-1418.5

.

History.

2003, c. 101.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 101, cl. 3 provides: “That the revenue generated by this act shall be used solely for the removal and recycling of tires from waste tire piles. The Department of Environmental Quality shall report by December 1 of each year to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources on the use of these funds and the progress in cleaning up tire piles.”

§ 10.1-1418.5.
Lien for waste tire pile removal.

The Commonwealth shall have a lien, if perfected as hereinafter provided, on land subject to removal action under §

10.1-1418.4

for the amount of the actual and reasonable costs incurred to complete such removal action.

The Director shall perfect the lien given under the provisions of this section by filing, within six months after completion of the removal, in the clerk’s office of the court of the county or city in which the land or any part of the land is situated, a statement consisting of (i) the name of the owner of record of the property sought to be charged, (ii) an itemized account of moneys expended for the removal work, and (iii) a brief description of the property to which the lien attaches.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in whose office the statement described in subsection B is filed to record the statement in the deed books of the office and to index the statement in the general index of deeds in the name of the Commonwealth as well as the owner of the property, and shall show the type of such lien. From the time of such recording and indexing, all persons shall be deemed to have notice thereof.

Liens acquired under this section shall have priority as a lien second only to the lien of real estate taxes imposed upon the land.

Any party having an interest in the real property against which a lien has been filed may, within 60 days of such filing, petition the court of equity having jurisdiction wherein the property or some portion of the property is located to hold a hearing to review the amount of the lien. After reasonable notice to the Director, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether such costs were reasonable. If the court determines that such charges were excessive, it shall determine the proper amount and order that the lien and the record be amended to show the new amount.

Liens acquired under this article shall be satisfied to the extent of the value of the consideration received at the time of transfer of ownership. Any unsatisfied portion shall remain as a lien on the property and shall be satisfied in accordance with this section. The proceeds from any lien shall be deposited in the Waste Tire Trust Fund established pursuant to §

10.1-1422.3

. If an owner fails to satisfy a lien as provided herein, the Director may proceed to enforce the lien by a bill filed in the court of equity having jurisdiction wherein the property or some portion of the property is located.

History.

2003, c. 101.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 101, cl. 3 provides: “That the revenue generated by this act shall be used solely for the removal and recycling of tires from waste tire piles. The Department of Environmental Quality shall report by December 1 of each year to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources on the use of these funds and the progress in cleaning up tire piles.”

§ 10.1-1419.
Litter receptacles; placement; penalty for violations.

The Board shall promulgate regulations establishing reasonable guidelines for the owners or persons in control of any property which is held out to the public as a place for assemblage, the transaction of business, recreation or as a public way who may be required to place and maintain receptacles acceptable to the Board.In formulating such regulations the Board shall consider, among other public places, the public highways of the Commonwealth, all parks, campgrounds, trailer parks, drive-in restaurants, construction sites, gasoline service stations, shopping centers, retail store parking lots, parking lots of major industrial and business firms, marinas, boat launching areas, boat moorage and fueling stations, public and private piers and beaches and bathing areas. The number of such receptacles required to be placed as specified herein shall be determined by the Board and related to the need for such receptacles. Such litter receptacles shall be maintained in a manner to prevent overflow or spillage.

A person owning or operating any establishment or public place in which litter receptacles of a design acceptable to the Board are required by this section shall procure and place such receptacles at his own expense on the premises in accordance with Board regulations.

Any person who fails to place and maintain such litter receptacles on the premises in the number and manner required by Board regulation, or who violates the provisions of this section or regulations adopted hereunder shall be subject to a fine of twenty-five dollars for each day of violation.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.6; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1420.
Litter bag.

The Department may design and produce a litter bag bearing the state anti-litter symbol and a statement of the penalties prescribed for littering. Such litter bags may be distributed by the Department of Motor Vehicles at no charge to the owner of every licensed vehicle in the Commonwealth at the time and place of the issuance of a license or renewal thereof. The Department may make the litter bags available to the owners of watercraft in the Commonwealth and may also provide the litter bags at no charge to tourists and visitors at points of entry into the Commonwealth and at visitor centers to the operators of incoming vehicles and watercraft.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.7; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1421.
Responsibility for removal of litter from receptacles.

The responsibility for the removal of litter from litter receptacles placed at parks, beaches, campgrounds, trailer parks, and other public places shall remain upon those state and local agencies now performing litter removal services. The removal of litter from litter receptacles placed on private property used by the public shall remain the duty of the owner or operator of such private property.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.8; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1422.
Further duties of Department.

In addition to the foregoing duties the Department shall:

Serve as the coordinating agency between the various industry and business organizations seeking to aid in the recycling, beneficial use, and anti-litter effort;

Recommend to local governing bodies that they adopt ordinances similar to the provisions of this article;

Cooperate with all local governments to accomplish coordination of local recycling, beneficial use, and anti-litter efforts;

Encourage all voluntary local recycling, beneficial use, and anti-litter campaigns seeking to focus the attention of the public on the programs of the Commonwealth to control and remove litter and encourage recycling;

Investigate the availability of, and apply for, funds available from any private or public source to be used in the program provided for in this article;

Allocate funds annually for the study of available research and development in recycling and litter control, removal, and disposal, as well as study methods for implementation in the Commonwealth of such research and development. In addition, such funds may be used for the development of public educational programs concerning the litter problem and recycling. Grants shall be made available for these purposes to those persons deemed appropriate and qualified by the Board or the Department;

Investigate the methods and success of other techniques in recycling and the control of litter, and develop, encourage, and coordinate programs in the Commonwealth to utilize successful techniques in recycling and beneficial use and the control and elimination of litter; and

Expend, after receiving the recommendations of the Advisory Board, at least 95% of the funds deposited annually into the Fund pursuant to contracts with localities. The Department may enter into contracts with planning district commissions for the receipt and expenditure of funds attributable to localities which designate in writing to the Department a planning district commission as the agency to receive and expend funds hereunder.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.9; 1988, c. 891; 1995, c. 417; 2006, c. 6; 2009, c. 409; 2018, c. 615.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 615, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) shall provide to the General Assembly, not later than November 1, 2019, an evaluation of Virginia’s solid waste recycling rates and a set of recommendations for improving the reliability of the supply of recycled materials during the next 10 years in order to provide for beneficial use, as defined in §

10.1-1414

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, by industry. The evaluation shall consider incentive-based strategies, including the granting of economic development incentives for the construction of recycling centers and beneficiation facilities that have the potential to increase beneficial use of glass, plastic, metal, and fiber. The evaluation shall also investigate the effect of the operation of mixed-waste material recycling facilities on the quality and quantity of recyclable materials available for beneficial use.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 6 substituted “90%” for “seventy-five percent” in the first sentence of subdivision 8.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 409 substituted “95% of the funds” for “90% of the funds” in the first sentence of subdivision 8.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 615 inserted “beneficial use” four times.